Missouri, session 2026, HB3049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509, 43.527, 43.530, 43.533, 43.650,
43.651, 589.400, 589.401, 589.402, 589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407, 589.410, 589.414,
589.415, and 589.417, RSMo, are repealed and nineteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509, 43.527, 43.530, 589.400, 589.401,
589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407, 589.410, 589.411, 589.412, 589.413, 589.414, 589.415,
and 589.417, to read as follows:
43.500. As used in sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administration of criminal justice", performance of any of the following
activities: detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution,
adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal
offenders. The administration of criminal justice shall include the screening of employees or
applicants seeking employment with criminal justice agencies, criminal identification
activities, and the collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history information,
including fingerprint searches, photographs, and other unique biometric identification;
(2) "Central repository", the division within the Missouri state highway patrol
responsible for compiling and disseminating complete and accurate criminal history records
and statistics;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3049 2
(3) "Committee", criminal records and justice information advisory committee;
(4) "Comparable ordinance violation", a violation of an ordinance having all the
essential elements of a statutory felony or a class A misdemeanor;
(5) "Criminal history record information", information collected by criminal justice
agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests,
detentions, indictments, informations, or other formal criminal charges, and any disposition
arising therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release;
(6) "Final disposition", the formal conclusion of a criminal proceeding at whatever
stage it occurs in the criminal justice system;
(7) "Missouri charge code", a unique number assigned by the office of state courts
administrator to an offense for tracking and grouping offenses. Beginning January 1, 2005,
the complete charge code shall consist of digits assigned by the office of state courts
administrator, the two-digit national crime information center modifiers and a single digit
designating attempt, accessory, or conspiracy. The only exception to the January 1, 2005,
date shall be the courts that are not using the statewide court automation case management
pursuant to section 476.055; the effective date will be as soon thereafter as economically
feasible for all other courts;
(8) "State offense cycle number", a unique number, supplied by or approved by the
Missouri state highway patrol, on the state criminal fingerprint card. The offense cycle
number, OCN, is used to link the identity of a person, through unique biometric identification,
to one or many offenses for which the person is arrested or charged. The OCN will be used to
track an offense incident from the date of arrest to the final disposition when the offender
exits from the criminal justice system;
(9) "Unique biometric identification", automated methods of recognizing and
identifying an individual based on a physiological characteristic. Biometric identification
methods may include but are not limited to facial recognition, fingerprints, palm prints, hand
geometry, iris recognition, and retinal scan.
43.503. 1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and accurate criminal history
record information, all police officers of this state, the clerk of each court, the department of
corrections, the sheriff of each county, the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a
county and the prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within
a county shall submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition information to the
central repository for filing without undue delay in the form and manner required by sections
43.500 to [43.651] 43.600.
2. All law enforcement agencies making misdemeanor and felony arrests as
determined by section 43.506 shall furnish without undue delay, to the central repository,
fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric identification collected,

HB 3049 3
charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such
offenses on standard fingerprint forms supplied or approved by the highway patrol or
electronically in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with
the standards set by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint
Identification System or its successor program. All such agencies shall also notify the central
repository of all decisions not to refer such arrests for prosecution. An agency making such
arrests may enter into arrangements with other law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
furnishing without undue delay such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other
unique biometric identification collected, charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions
to the central repository upon its behalf.
3. In order for the Missouri office of prosecution services to maintain complete and
accurate statewide reports as required by section 56.750, on or before January 1, 2028, and
thereafter, all police officers of this state, the sheriff and each deputy sheriff of each county,
and the chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county and his or her officers
shall submit referrals for any traffic violation, ordinance violation, or misdemeanor or felony
offense referred to a prosecuting or circuit attorney in the form and manner approved by the
Missouri office of prosecution services as required by subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of
section 56.750. At a minimum, any referral to a prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney for a
felony offense shall include a probable cause statement and an investigative report. Any law
enforcement agency that violates this subsection shall be ineligible to receive state or federal
funds that would otherwise be paid to such agency for law enforcement, safety, or criminal
justice purposes.
4. In instances where an individual less than seventeen years of age and not currently
certified as an adult is taken into custody for an offense which would be a felony if committed
by an adult, the arresting officer shall take fingerprints for the central repository. These
fingerprints shall be taken on fingerprint cards supplied by or approved by the highway patrol
or transmitted electronically in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in
compliance with the standards set by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated
Fingerprint Identification System or its successor program. The fingerprint cards shall be so
constructed that the name of the juvenile should not be made available to the central
repository. The individual's name and the unique number associated with the fingerprints and
other pertinent information shall be provided to the court of jurisdiction by the agency taking
the juvenile into custody. The juvenile's fingerprints and other information shall be
forwarded to the central repository and the courts without undue delay. The fingerprint
information from the card shall be captured and stored in the automated fingerprint
identification system operated by the central repository. In the event the fingerprints are
found to match other tenprints or unsolved latent prints, the central repository shall notify the

HB 3049 4
submitting agency who shall notify the court of jurisdiction as per local agreement. Under
section 211.031, in instances where a juvenile over fifteen and one-half years of age is alleged
to have violated a state or municipal traffic ordinance or regulation, which does not constitute
a felony, and the juvenile court does not have jurisdiction, the juvenile shall not be
fingerprinted unless certified as an adult.
5. Upon certification of the individual as an adult, the certifying court shall order a
law enforcement agency to immediately fingerprint and photograph the individual and
certification papers will be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency with the
order for fingerprinting. The law enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints,
photograph, and certification papers to the central repository within fifteen days and shall
furnish the offense cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the prosecuting attorney
or the circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the clerk of the court ordering the
subject fingerprinted. If the juvenile is acquitted of the crime and is no longer certified as an
adult, the prosecuting attorney shall notify within fifteen days the central repository of the
change of status of the juvenile. Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and
photographed after being taken into custody shall be closed records as provided under section
610.100 if a petition has not been filed within thirty days of the date that the child was taken
into custody; and if a petition for the child has not been filed within one year of the date the
child was taken into custody, any records relating to the child concerning the alleged offense
may be expunged under the procedures in sections 610.122 to 610.126.
6. The prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit attorney of a city not within
a county or the municipal prosecuting attorney shall notify the central repository on standard
forms supplied by the highway patrol or in a manner approved by the highway patrol of his or
her decision to not file a criminal charge on any charge referred to such prosecuting attorney
or circuit attorney for criminal charges. All records forwarded to the central repository and
the courts by prosecutors or circuit attorneys as required by sections 43.500 to 43.530 shall
include the state offense cycle number of the offense, the charge code for the offense, and the
originating agency identifier number of the reporting prosecutor, using such numbers as
assigned by the highway patrol.
7. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county or municipal
court clerk shall furnish the central repository, on standard forms supplied by the highway
patrol or in a manner approved by the highway patrol, with a record of all charges filed,
including all those added subsequent to the filing of a criminal court case, amended charges,
and all final dispositions of cases for which the central repository has a record of an arrest or a
record of fingerprints reported pursuant to sections 43.500 to 43.506. Such information shall
include, for each charge:

HB 3049 5
(1) All judgments of not guilty, acquittals on the ground of mental disease or defect
excluding responsibility, judgments or pleas of guilty including the sentence, if any, or
probation, if any, pronounced by the court, nolle pros, discharges, releases and dismissals in
the trial court;
(2) Court orders filed with the clerk of the courts which reverse a reported conviction
or vacate or modify a sentence;
(3) Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to probation, supervision or
conditional release and any resentencing after such revocation; and
(4) The offense cycle number of the offense, and the originating agency identifier
number of the sentencing court, using such numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
8. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not within a county shall furnish, to
the department of corrections or department of mental health, court judgment and sentence
documents and the state offense cycle number and the charge code of the offense which
resulted in the commitment or assignment of an offender to the jurisdiction of the department
of corrections or the department of mental health if the person is committed pursuant to
chapter 552. This information shall be reported to the department of corrections or the
100 department of mental health at the time of commitment or assignment. If the offender was
101 already in the custody of the department of corrections or the department of mental health at
102 the time of such subsequent conviction, the clerk shall furnish notice of such subsequent
103 conviction to the appropriate department by certified mail, return receipt requested, or in a
104 manner and format mutually agreed to, within fifteen days of such disposition.
105 9. Information and fingerprints, photograph and if available, any other unique
106 biometric identification collected, forwarded to the central repository, normally obtained from
107 a person at the time of the arrest, may be obtained at any time the subject is in the criminal
108 justice system or committed to the department of mental health. A law enforcement agency
109 or the department of corrections may fingerprint, photograph, and capture any other unique
110 biometric identification of the person unless collecting other unique biometric identification
111 of the person is not financially feasible for the law enforcement agency, and obtain the
112 necessary information at any time the subject is in custody. If at the time of any court
113 appearance, the defendant has not been fingerprinted and photographed for an offense in
114 which a fingerprint and photograph is required by statute to be collected, maintained, or
115 disseminated by the central repository, the court shall order a law enforcement agency or
116 court marshal to fingerprint and photograph immediately the defendant. The order for
117 fingerprints shall contain the offense, charge code, date of offense, and any other information
118 necessary to complete the fingerprint card. The law enforcement agency or court marshal
119 shall submit such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique biometric
120 identification collected, to the central repository without undue delay and within thirty days

HB 3049 6
121 and shall furnish the offense cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the prosecuting
122 attorney or the circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the court clerk of the court
123 ordering the subject fingerprinted.
124 10. The department of corrections and the department of mental health shall furnish
125 the central repository with all information concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death,
126 release, pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of executive clemency, legal name
127 change, or discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that department's custody for
128 any offenses which are mandated by law to be collected, maintained or disseminated by the
129 central repository. All records forwarded to the central repository by the department as
130 required by sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall include the offense cycle number of the
131 offense, and the originating agency identifier number of the department using such numbers
132 as assigned by the highway patrol.
43.506. 1. Those offenses considered reportable for the purposes of sections 43.500
to [43.651] 43.600include all felonies; class A misdemeanors; all violations for driving under
the influence of drugs or alcohol; any offense that can be enhanced to a class A misdemeanor
or higher for subsequent violations; and comparable ordinance violations consistent with the
reporting standards established by the National Crime Information Center, Federal Bureau of
Investigation, for the Federal Interstate Identification Index System; and all cases arising
under chapter 566. The following types of offenses shall not be considered reportable for the
purposes of sections 57.403, 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, and 595.200 to 595.218: nonspecific
charges of suspicion or investigation, general traffic violations and all misdemeanor
violations of the state wildlife code. All offenses considered reportable shall be reviewed
annually and noted in the Missouri charge code manual established in section 43.512. All
information collected pursuant to sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall be available only
as set forth in section 610.120.
2. Law enforcement agencies, court clerks, prosecutors and custody agencies may
report required information by electronic medium either directly to the central repository or
indirectly to the central repository via other criminal justice agency computer systems in the
state with the approval of the highway patrol, based upon standards established by the
advisory committee.
3. In addition to the repository of fingerprint records for individual offenders and
applicants, the central repository of criminal history and identification records for the state
shall maintain a repository of latent prints, palm prints and other unique biometric
identification submitted to the repository.
43.509. The director of the department of public safety shall, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 536, establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement
the provisions of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600. All collection and dissemination of

HB 3049 7
criminal history information shall be in compliance with chapter 610 and applicable federal
laws or regulations. Such rules shall relate to the collection of criminal history information
from or dissemination of such information to criminal justice, noncriminal justice, and private
agencies or citizens both in this and other states. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
under the authority of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall become effective unless it has
been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
43.527. For purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, all federal and nonstate
of Missouri agencies and persons shall pay for criminal records checks, fingerprint searches,
and any of the information as defined in subdivision (5) of section 43.500, when such
information is not related to the administration of criminal justice. There shall be no charge
for information supplied to criminal justice agencies for the administration of criminal justice.
For purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600, the administration of criminal justice is
defined in subdivision (1) of section 43.500 and shall be available only as set forth in section
610.120.
43.530. 1. For each request requiring the payment of a fee received by the central
repository, the requesting entity shall pay a fee of not more than nine dollars per request for
criminal history record information not based on a fingerprint search. In each year beginning
on or after January 1, 2010, the superintendent may increase the fee paid by requesting
entities by an amount not to exceed one dollar per year, however, under no circumstance shall
the fee paid by requesting entities exceed fifteen dollars per request.
2. For each request requiring the payment of a fee received by the central repository,
the requesting entity shall pay a fee of not more than twenty dollars per request for criminal
history record information based on a fingerprint search, unless the request is required under
the provisions of subdivision (6) of section 210.481, section 210.487, or section 571.101, in
which case the fee shall be fourteen dollars.
3. A request made under subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall be limited to check
and search on one individual. Each request shall be accompanied by a check, warrant,
voucher, money order, or electronic payment payable to the state of Missouri-criminal record
system or payment shall be made in a manner approved by the highway patrol. The highway
patrol may establish procedures for receiving requests for criminal history record information
for classification and search for fingerprints, from courts and other entities, and for the
payment of such requests. There is hereby established by the treasurer of the state of
Missouri a fund to be entitled as the "Criminal Record System Fund". Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, if the moneys collected and deposited into this
fund are not totally expended annually for the purposes set forth in sections 43.500 to
[43.651] 43.600, the unexpended moneys in such fund shall remain in the fund and the
balance shall be kept in the fund to accumulate from year to year.

HB 3049 8
589.400. 1. Unless exempt from registering under section 589.401, sections
589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense [referenced in section 589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401] that would classify the person as a tier
I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender in this state;
(2) [Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit one or more of the following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the
first degree when the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the
child; abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a child and the defendant is
not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a resident of a
nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
first or second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting prostitution in the second degree;
promoting prostitution in the third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child
pornography in the first degree; promoting child pornography in the second degree;
possession of child pornography; furnishing pornographic material to minors; public display
of explicit sexual material; coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting obscenity in
the first degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second degree; incest;
use of a child in a sexual performance; or promoting sexual performance by a child;
patronizing prostitution if the individual the person patronizes is less than eighteen years of
age;
(3)] Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the department of
mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
[(4)] (3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as a result of
mental disease or defect of any offense [referenced in section 589.414] that would classify
the person as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender;
[(5)] (4) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of general
jurisdiction who has been adjudicated for an offense [listed under section 589.414] that
would classify the juvenile as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender;
[(6)] (5) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense who has
been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated sexual abuse
under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such
offense. Juveniles registering under this subdivision shall be assigned a tier under the

HB 3049 9
provisions of section 589.414 and eligible for removal when meeting all other
qualifications in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under section
589.414 shall be only for the purposes of registration visit frequency and removal
eligibility and shall not otherwise affect the analysis of whether registration is required
under this section;
[(7)] (6) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1, 1979, been
or is hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in
this state, would constitute an offense [listed under section 589.414] that would classify the
person as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender, or has been or is required
to register in another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been
or is required to register under tribal, federal, or military law. Persons registering under
this subdivision shall be assigned a tier under the provisions of section 589.414 and
eligible for removal when meeting all other qualifications in sections 589.400 to 589.425.
The tier assignment under section 589.414 shall be only for the purposes of registration
visit frequency and removal eligibility and shall not otherwise affect the analysis of
whether registration is required under this section; or
[(8)] (7) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or attends an educational institution, whether public or
private in nature, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a temporary
residence in Missouri. ["Part-time" in this subdivision means for more than seven days in any
twelve-month period.] Persons registering under this subdivision shall be assigned a tier
under the provisions of section 589.414 and eligible for removal when meeting all other
qualifications in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under section 589.414
shall be only for the purposes of registration visit frequency and removal eligibility and
shall not otherwise affect the analysis of whether registration is required under this
section.
2. Any person or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall, within
three business days of adjudication, release from incarceration, [or] placement upon
probation, release from commitment to the division of youth services, release from the
department of mental health, or release from other placement,register with the [chief law
enforcement] registration official of the county or city not within a county in which such
person or juvenile resides unless such person has already registered in that county for the
same offense. [For any juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within
three business days of adjudication or release from commitment to the division of youth

HB 3049 10
services, the department of mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall register with
the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which he or she
resides unless he or she has already registered in such county or city not within a county for
the same offense.] Any person or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not
currently registered in their county of residence shall register with the [chief law
enforcement] registration official [of such county or city not within a county] within three
business days. The [chief law enforcement] registration official shall forward a copy of the
registration form required by section 589.407 to a city, town, village, or campus law
enforcement agency located within the county of the [chief law enforcement] registration
official.
3. [The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as
provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name shall be
removed from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414; or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the registry under
section 589.401.
4.] The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I [sex] offender [as provided under section
589.414];
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II [sex] offender [as provided under
section 589.414]; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III [sex] offender.
[5.] 4. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in subdivision (3) of
this subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean record for the periods described
100 under subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
101 (a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one
102 year may be imposed;
103 (b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
104 (c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation, or parole;
105 and
106 (d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified
107 by a jurisdiction or the attorney general, regardless of whether such program was court
108 ordered or voluntary. If records of program completion are unavailable and completion
109 of such program was required as a term of probation, an order discharging the offender
110 from probation or other record acknowledging satisfactory completion of probation

HB 3049 11
111 shall constitute prima facie evidence that the offender successfully completed the
112 necessary sex offender treatment program unless rebutted by evidence to the contrary.
113 (2) In the case of a:
114 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained
115 is ten years;
116 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which required
117 registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during
118 which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-five years.
119 (3) In the case of a:
120 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the reduction is five years;
121 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from life to that
122 period for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection is
123 maintained.
124 [6.] 5. For processing an initial sex offender registration, the [chief law enforcement
125 officer of the county or city not within a county] registration officialmay charge the offender
126 registering a fee of up to ten dollars.
127 [7.] 6. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to section 589.414,
128 the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of the county or city not within a county]
129 may charge the person changing their registration a fee of five dollars for each change made
130 after the initial registration.
131 [8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
132 required to register for being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of a nonsexual
133 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child,
134 nonsexual child abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a
135 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the
136 child shall be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain on the sexual
137 offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register under
138 sections 589.400 to 589.425.
139 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual offender upon
140 petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such person shall
141 remain on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to
142 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
143 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
144 required to register for a sexual offense involving:
145 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim or
146 any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was under the
147 custodial authority of the offender at the time of the offense; or

HB 3049 12
148 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim,
149 the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than four years
150 older than the victim at the time of the offense; or
151 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual offenses:
152 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
153 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
154 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
155 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
156 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;
157 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced
158 labor under section 566.206;
159 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;
160 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of documentation under
161 section 566.215; or
162 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide the information
163 and notice as required under section 578.475.
164 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having been adjudicated
165 for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or other comparable
166 offenses listed under section 589.414 may file a petition under section 589.401.]
167 7. Any person with a primary residence outside this state who has a temporary
168 residence in this state in which he or she resides for more than a part-time period shall
169 register with the registration official in the jurisdiction of the temporary residence in
170 accordance with this section for the duration of such person's temporary residency.
171 [11.] 8. Any [nonresident worker] person who is not a resident of this state and not
172 currently registered due to temporary residence under subsection 7 of this section and
173 who works, including work as a volunteer or intern, or is a nonresident student shall register
174 for the duration of such person's employment, including participation as a volunteer or intern,
175 or attendance at any school of higher education, whether public or private, including any
176 secondary school, trade school, professional school, or institution of higher education on a
177 full-time or part-time basis [in this state unless granted relief under section 589.401. Any
178 registered offender shall provide information regarding any place in which the offender is
179 staying when away from his or her residence for seven or more days, including the period of
180 time the offender is staying in such place. Any registered offender from another state who
181 has a temporary residence in this state and resides more than seven days in a twelve-month
182 period shall register for the duration of such person's temporary residency unless granted
183 relief under section 589.401], as long as the status requiring registration remains active.
184 Such registration shall occur in the county or city not within a county where the status

HB 3049 13
185 requiring registration occurs. If more than one county or city not within a county meets
186 the requirement, priority shall be in the following order:
187 (1) The county of work;
188 (2) The county of school; and
189 (3) The county of volunteering or any other required status,
190
191 with registration being required at only the highest priority county or city not within a
192 county where the registerable status remains.
589.401. 1. A person on the sexual offender registry of this state may file a petition
in the division of the circuit court in the county or city not within a county in which the
offense requiring registration was [committed] adjudicated to have his or her name
exempted or removed from the sexual offender registry in accordance with this section.
2. (1) A person who is required to register in this state because of an offense that was
adjudicated in another jurisdiction shall file his or her petition for removal, termination, or
relief from registration, or the declaratory judgment providing for removal,
termination, or relief from registration according to the laws of the state, federal,
territory, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the District of Columbia, or foreign country in which
his or her offense was adjudicated. Upon [the grant of the petition for removal in the] entry
of a judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction [where the offense was adjudicated]
providing that the person is no longer required to register as a sex offender under the
laws of the adjudicating jurisdiction, such judgment may be registered in this state by
sending the information required under subsection 5 of this section as well as one
authenticated copy of the order granting removal from the sexual offender registry in the
jurisdiction where the offense was adjudicated to the court in the county or city not within a
county in which the offender is required to register. On receipt of a request for registration
removal, the registering court shall cause the order to be filed as a foreign judgment, together
with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form. The petitioner
shall be responsible for costs associated with filing the petition. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to remove any requirements for a petition under this section or to
remove the requirement that a person prove he or she is entitled to removal under
Missouri law, when applicable.
(2) A person required to register as an offender in this state based solely on an
offense adjudicated in another jurisdiction may file a petition for removal from this
state's sexual offender registry, provided that:
(a) The offense did not require the person to register as an offender in the
adjudicating jurisdiction at the time the offense was adjudicated; or

HB 3049 14
(b) The person never resided, worked, or attended school in the adjudicating
jurisdiction and was never required to register in the adjudicating jurisdiction.
(3) A petition filed under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall otherwise satisfy
the requirements applicable to a petition filed under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. A person required to register as a tier III offender shall not file a petition under this
section unless the requirement to register results from a juvenile adjudication.
4. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice if the following time periods
have not elapsed since the date the person was required to register for his or her most recent
offense under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
(1) For a tier I offense, ten years;
(2) For a tier II offense, twenty-five years; or
(3) For a tier III offense adjudicated delinquent, twenty-five years.
5. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice if it fails to include any of the
following:
(1) The petitioner's:
(a) Full name, including any alias used by the [individual] petitioner;
(b) Sex;
(c) Race;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) Last four digits of the Social Security number;
(f) Address; and
(g) Place of employment, school, or volunteer status;
(2) The offense and tier of the offense that required the petitioner to register;
(3) The date the petitioner was adjudicated for the offense;
(4) The date the petitioner was required to register;
(5) The case number and court, including the county or city not within a county, that
entered the original order for the adjudicated sex offense;
(6) Petitioner's original fingerprints on an applicant fingerprint card;
(7) If the petitioner was pardoned or an offense requiring registration was reversed,
vacated, or set aside, an authenticated copy of the order; and
(8) If the petitioner is currently registered under applicable law and has not been
adjudicated for failure to register in any jurisdiction and does not have any charges pending
for failure to register.
6. The petition shall name as respondents the Missouri state highway patrol and the
[chief law enforcement] registration official in the county or city not within a county in
which the petition is filed.

HB 3049 15
7. All proceedings under this section shall be governed under the Missouri supreme
court rules of civil procedure.
8. The person seeking removal or exemption from the registry shall provide the
prosecuting attorney in the circuit court in which the petition is filed with notice of the
petition. The prosecuting attorney may present evidence in opposition to the requested relief
or may otherwise demonstrate the reasons why the petition should be denied. Failure of the
person seeking removal or exemption from the registry to notify the prosecuting attorney of
the petition shall result in an automatic denial of such person's petition.
9. The Missouri state highway patrol, theprosecuting attorney in the circuit court in
which the petition is filed, and the petitioner shall have access to all applicable records
concerning the petitioner including, but not limited to, criminal history records, mental health
records, juvenile records, and records of the department of corrections or probation and
parole.
10. The prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable efforts to notify the victim of the
crime for which the person was required to register of the petition and the dates and times of
any hearings or other proceedings in connection with such petition.
11. The court shall not enter an order directing the removal of the petitioner's name
from the sexual offender registry unless it finds the petitioner:
(1) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges pending for any additional
nonsexual offense for which imprisonment for more than one year may be imposed since the
date the offender was required to register for his or her current tier level;
(2) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges pending for any additional sex
offense that would require registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 since the date the
offender was required to register for his or her current tier level, even if the offense was
punishable by less than one year imprisonment;
(3) Has successfully completed any required periods of supervised release, probation,
or parole without revocation since the date the offender was required to register for his or her
current tier level, or, in the case of lifetime supervision or probation, such term has been
reduced or terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(4) Has successfully completed an appropriate sex offender treatment program as
approved by a court of competent jurisdiction or the Missouri department of corrections; and
(5) Is not a current or potential threat to public safety.
12. In order to meet the criteria required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 11
of this section, the fingerprints filed in the case shall be examined by the Missouri state
highway patrol. The petitioner shall be responsible for all costs associated with the
100 fingerprint-based criminal history check of both state and federal files under section 43.530.

HB 3049 16
101 13. If the petition is denied due to an adjudication in violation of subdivision (1) or
102 (2) of subsection 11 of this section, the petitioner shall not file a new petition under this
103 section until:
104 (1) Fifteen years have passed from the date of the adjudication resulting in the denial
105 of relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier I offender;
106 (2) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of adjudication resulting in the
107 denial of relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier II offender; or
108 (3) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of the adjudication resulting in the
109 denial of relief if the petitioner is classified as a tier III offender on the basis of a juvenile
110 adjudication.
111 14. If the petition is denied due to the petitioner having charges pending in violation
112 of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 11 of this section, the petitioner shall not file a new
113 petition under this section until:
114 (1) The pending charges resulting in the denial of relief have been finally disposed of
115 in a manner other than adjudication; or
116 (2) If the pending charges result in an adjudication, the necessary time period has
117 elapsed under subsection 13 of this section.
118 15. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, if the petition is
119 denied for reasons other than those outlined in subsection 11 of this section, no successive
120 petition requesting such relief shall be filed for at least five years from the date the judgment
121 denying relief is entered.
122 (2) If the denial was based on a statute or law that has since been amended,
123 repealed, or invalidated, a person may file a new petition within the five-year period. In
124 addition to the requirements under subsection 5 of this section, the new petition shall
125 include the case number and court of the prior petition and identify the applicable
126 change in the statute or law.
127 16. If the court finds the petitioner is entitled to have his or her name removed from
128 the sexual offender registry, the court shall enter judgment directing the removal of the name.
129 A copy of the judgment shall be provided to the respondents named in the petition.
130 17. Any person subject to the judgment requiring his or her name to be removed from
131 the sexual offender registry is not required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
132 unless such person is required to register for an offense that was different from that listed on
133 the judgment of removal.
134 18. The court shall not deny the petition unless the petition failed to comply with the
135 provisions of sections 589.400 to 589.425 or the prosecuting attorney provided evidence
136 demonstrating the petition should be denied.

HB 3049 17
137 19. (1) The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not apply to
138 persons filing for exemption pursuant to this subsection.
139 (2) Except as provided in this subsection, a petition for exemption shall be
140 governed by the other requirements provided in this section.
141 (3) A petition for exemption under this subsection shall be the exclusive remedy
142 for adjudicating the applicability of the exemptions in this subsection.
143 (4) A person shall be ordered exempt from registration if the person meets the
144 requirements of this section and the offense requiring registration is:
145 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the
146 victim, the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the person was not more than
147 four years older than the victim at the time of the offense, unless the victim was under
148 the custodial authority of the offender at the time of the offense;
149 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the
150 victim or any other individual involved if the victim or other individual was eighteen
151 years of age or older, unless the victim was under the custodial authority of the offender
152 at the time of the offense;
153 (c) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
154 (d) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
155 (e) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
156 (f) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060; or
157 (g) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065.
158 (5) The person shall have the burden of proving the person meets the
159 requirements for exemption. In determining whether the person meets the
160 requirements, a court may look beyond the offense of conviction and consider the
161 underlying facts and conduct of the offense when evaluating noncategorical exemptions.
162 (6) If a court determines a person to be exempt, the provisions of sections
163 589.400 to 589.425 shall not apply for the purposes of the exempt offense. In the event a
164 person currently registering is found to be exempt from the registration visit
165 requirements, the person shall also be removed from the sexual offender registry.
166 (7) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person from remaining or being
167 placed on the sexual offender registry for any other nonexempt offense for which the
168 person is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425.
169 (8) If a petition for exemption is filed before a person is required to register
170 under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall
171 be automatically stayed pending the outcome. In the event a petition is denied, the
172 requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall be in effect three business days
173 following the exhaustion of all appeal rights. Nothing in this subdivision shall alter or be

HB 3049 18
174 construed to give any court authority to alter ongoing requirements for persons whose
175 initial registration requirement begins prior to the filing of a petition for exemption until
176 a final order of exemption is entered.
177 20. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not apply to
178 persons filing for removal if the offense requiring registration is reversed, vacated, or set
179 aside. A petition for removal due to the offense being reversed, vacated, or set aside
180 shall be filed in accordance with all other requirements of this section and shall be the
181 exclusive remedy for removal in such situations. Such petition shall include a certified
182 copy of the action reversing, vacating, or setting aside the offense requiring registration.
183 21. This section shall be the sole remedy for removal or exemption for persons
184 adjudicated of a registerable offense. No declaratory action shall be filed for relief from
185 registration requirements, except if registration, or threat thereof, is the result of an
186 offense never requiring registration. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
187 prohibit the filing of a declaratory action solely on the issue of what tier an offender
188 should be classified under.
589.403. 1. Any person who is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and who is paroled, discharged, or otherwise released from any correctional facility of the
department of corrections, any mental health institution, private jail under section 221.095, or
other private facility recognized by or contracted with the department of corrections or
department of mental health where such person was confined shall:
(1) If the person plans to reside in this state, be informed by the official in charge of
such correctional facility, private jail, or mental health institution of the person's possible duty
to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425. If such person is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in charge of the correctional facility,
private jail, or the mental health institution shall complete the initial registration notification
at least seven days prior to release and [forward] report the offender's initial registration[,]
notification in accordance with subsection 1 of section 589.410 within three business days
of release[,] to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement] registration
official of the county or city not within a county where the person expects to reside upon
discharge, parole, or release; or
(2) If the person does not reside or plan to reside in Missouri, be informed by the
official in charge of such correctional facility, private jail, or mental health institution of the
person's possible duty to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425. If such person is
required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in charge of the
correctional facility, private jail, or [the] mental health institution shall complete the initial
registration notification at least seven days prior to release and [forward] report the
offender's initial registration[,] notification in accordance with subsection 1 of section

HB 3049 19
589.410 within three business days of release[,] to the Missouri state highway patrol and the
[chief law enforcement] registration official [within] of the county or city not within a
county where the correctional facility, private jail, or mental health institution is located.
2. If the offender refuses to complete and sign the registration information as outlined
in this section or fails to register with the [chief law enforcement] registration official within
three business days as directed, the offender commits the offense of failure to register under
section 589.425 within the jurisdiction where the correctional facility, private jail, or mental
health institution is located.
589.404. As used in sections 589.400 to 589.425, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adjudicated" or "adjudication", adjudication of delinquency, a finding of guilt,
plea of guilt, finding of not guilty due to mental disease or defect, or plea of nolo contendere
to committing, attempting to commit, or conspiring to commit. Adjudication does not
require the imposition of sentence for the purposes of sections 589.400 to 589.425. The
term "adjudication" shall include by reference all acts meeting the definition of
"conviction" under Section 111 of the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as
amended;
(2) "Adjudicated delinquent", a person found to have committed an offense that, if
committed by an adult, would be a criminal offense;
(3) "Chief law enforcement official", the sheriff's office of each county or the police
department of a city not within a county;
(4) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information or communication by the
use of the internet, a computer, a facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or
other wireless communication device, a video recorder, or other electronic means sent to
a person identified by a unique address or address number and received by that person;
(5) "Entity", a business or organization that provides internet service, electronic
communications service, remote computing service, online service, electronic mail
service, or electronic instant message or chat services regardless of whether the business
or organization is within or outside this state;
(6) "Instant message", a form of real-time text communication between two or
more people. The communication is conveyed via computers connected over a network
such as the internet, or between cell phone or wireless communication device users, or
over a cell phone or wireless communication device network;
(7) "Offender registration", the required minimum informational content of sex
offender registries, which shall consist of, but not be limited to, a full set of fingerprints on a
standard sex offender registration card upon initial registration in Missouri, as well as all

HB 3049 20
other forms and in whatever manner required by the Missouri state highway patrol upon
each initial and subsequent registration;
[(5)] (8) "Online identifier", includes all of the following: electronic mail
address, instant message screen name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless
communication device number or identifier, chat or other internet communication
name, social media profiles, IP addresses, or other identity information specified on the
registration form by the Missouri state highway patrol;
(9) "Part-time", more than seven days in any twelve-month period;
(10) "Probation officer", includes any agent of a private entity assigned to
provide probation supervision services to an offender due to the offender's status as a
sexual offender who is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(11) "Registration official", the chief law enforcement official for the county or
city not within a county in which the offender is required to register;
(12) "Residence", [any place where an offender sleeps for seven or more consecutive
or nonconsecutive days or nights within a twelve-month period] the domicile of the
offender;
[(6)] (13) "Sex offender", any person who meets the criteria to register under sections
589.400 to 589.425 or under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of
the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
[(7)] (14) "Sex offender registry", a system maintained by the Missouri state
highway patrol to collect, store, and disseminate all initial notification information,
registration information, offender status, and all other information required under
sections 589.400 to 589.425. The sex offender registry is a distinct system from the
website maintained by the Missouri state highway patrol, which displays a distinct set of
information contained within the sex offender registry publicly on the web in
accordance with this section;
(15) "Sex offense", any offense [which] that is listed [under section 589.414 or
comparable to those listed under section 589.414 or otherwise] as a tier I offense, tier II
offense, or tier III offense, that is comparable to offenses listed as a tier I offense, tier II
offense, or tier III offense, or that is otherwise comparable to offenses covered under the
Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection
and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
[(8)] (16) "Sexual act", any type or degree of genital, oral, or anal penetration;
[(9)] (17) "Sexual conduct", sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, or sexual
contact;
[(10)] (18) "Sexual contact", any touching of another person with the genitals or any
touching of the genitals or anus of another person, or the breast of a female person, or such

HB 3049 21
touching through the clothing, or causing semen, seminal fluid, or other ejaculate to come
into contact with another person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of
any person or for the purpose of terrorizing the victim;
[(11)] (19) "Sexual element", used for the purposes of distinguishing if sexual contact
or a sexual act was committed. Authorities shall refer to information filed by the prosecutor,
amended information filed by the prosecutor, indictment information filed by the prosecutor,
or amended indictment information filed by the prosecutor, the plea agreement, or court
documentation to determine if a sexual element exists;
[(12)] (20) "Signature", the name of the offender signed in writing or electronic form
approved by the Missouri state highway patrol;
[(13)] (21) "Student", an individual who enrolls in or attends the physical location of
an educational institution, including a public or private secondary school, trade or
professional school, or an institution of higher education;
[(14)] (22) "Temporary residence", any place where a person sleeps for seven or
more consecutive or nonconsecutive days or nights within a twelve-month period, other
than the person's domicile;
(23) "Tier I offender",
(a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier I offense; or
(b) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction for an offense comparable to a tier I offense or that meets the definition
of a tier I offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the
Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(24) "Tier II offender",
(a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier II offense; or
(b) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense comparable to a tier I offense
or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state failure to
register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to having
been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
(c) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is
comparable to a tier II offense or that meets the definition of a tier II offense under the
Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child
100 Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
101 (25) "Tier III offender",
102 (a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier III offense;

HB 3049 22
103 (b) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual offender or a persistent sexual
104 offender, as the terms "predatory sexual offender" and "persistent sexual offender" are
105 defined in section 566.125;
106 (c) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense comparable to a tier I offense
107 or tier II offense or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other
108 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required
109 to register as a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense,
110 two tier I offenses, or a combination of a tier I offense and a failure to register offense,
111 on a previous occasion;
112 (d) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
113 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an
114 offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III
115 offense or that meets the definition of a tier III offense under the Sex Offender
116 Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and
117 Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended; or
118 (e) Any offender who is adjudicated in this state for any offense of a sexual
119 nature or with a sexual element requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425
120 that is not classified as a tier I offense or tier II offense in this section;
121 (26) "Tier I offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
122 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 with sexual motivation
123 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
124 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual
125 motivation if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
126 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130 with sexual motivation
127 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
128 (d) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen
129 years of age;
130 (e) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed
131 prior to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year;
132 (f) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first
133 offense and the punishment is less than one year;
134 (g) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
135 (h) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;
136 (i) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
137 years of age or older;
138 (j) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is
139 less than a year;

HB 3049 23
140 (k) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
141 (l) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
142 first degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
143 (m) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
144 vulnerable person;
145 (n) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the
146 victim is eighteen years of age or older;
147 (o) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
148 victim is eighteen years of age or older;
149 (p) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020 if the victim is
150 less than eighteen years of age;
151 (q) Promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second degree under
152 section 573.030 if the victim is less than eighteen years of age;
153 (r) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037;
154 (s) Furnishing pornographic material to minors under section 573.040;
155 (t) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060 if the victim is
156 less than eighteen years of age; or
157 (u) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065 if the victim
158 is less than eighteen years of age;
159 (27) "Tier II offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
160 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
161 sixteen to seventeen years of age;
162 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
163 between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
164 (c) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
165 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
166 (d) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first
167 offense and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of one year or more;
168 (e) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
169 seventeen years of age;
170 (f) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is thirteen
171 to seventeen years of age;
172 (g) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the
173 victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
174 (h) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
175 (i) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;

HB 3049 24
176 (j) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the person patronized is
177 eighteen years of age or older;
178 (k) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim
179 is eighteen years of age or older;
180 (l) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the
181 victim is eighteen years of age or older;
182 (m) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the
183 victim is eighteen years of age or older;
184 (n) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and
185 the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
186 (o) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
187 (p) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025; or
188 (q) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035;
189 (28) "Tier III offense", the following adjudicated offenses:
190 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under
191 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
192 nature;
193 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 if the victim is under
194 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
195 nature;
196 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130 if the victim is under
197 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
198 nature;
199 (d) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
200 (e) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
201 (f) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
202 (g) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
203 (h) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
204 (i) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
205 (j) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
206 (k) Statutory sodomy in the first degree under section 566.062;
207 (l) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
208 under sixteen years of age;
209 (m) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
210 (n) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
211 (o) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
212 under thirteen years of age;

HB 3049 25
213 (p) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
214 under thirteen years of age;
215 (q) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
216 second or subsequent offense;
217 (r) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
218 thirteen years of age;
219 (s) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
220 thirteen years of age;
221 (t) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a
222 term of imprisonment of one year or more;
223 (u) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
224 first degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is one year or more;
225 (v) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under section 566.145 if the
226 victim is under thirteen years of age;
227 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if
228 the victim is under eighteen years of age;
229 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
230 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
231 (z) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
232 offender or if the person patronized is less than eighteen years of age;
233 (aa) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim
234 is under eighteen years of age;
235 (bb) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the
236 victim is under eighteen years of age;
237 (cc) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the
238 victim is under eighteen years of age;
239 (dd) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is
240 under eighteen years of age;
241 (ee) Incest under section 568.020;
242 (ff) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if
243 the offense is sexual in nature;
244 (gg) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under
245 section 568.045 with sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim
246 under eighteen years of age;
247 (hh) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature
248 and the victim is under thirteen years of age;
249 (ii) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;

HB 3049 26
250 (jj) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
251 (kk) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
252 (29) "Vehicle", any land vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft.
589.405. 1. Any person who is required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and who is released on probation, discharged upon payment of a fine, or released after
confinement in a county jail shall, prior to such release or discharge and at the time of
adjudication, be informed of the possible duty to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to
589.425 by the court having jurisdiction over the case. If such person is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 and is placed on probation, the court shall make it a
condition of probation that the offender report within three business days to the [chief law
enforcement] registration official of the county of adjudication or city not within a county of
adjudication to complete initial registration. If such offender is not placed on probation, the
court shall:
(1) If the offender resides in Missouri, complete the initial notification of duty to
register form approved by the state judicial records committee and the Missouri state highway
patrol and forward the form within three business days to the Missouri state highway patrol
and the [chief law enforcement] registration official in the county or city not within a county
in which the offender resides; or
(2) If the offender does not reside in Missouri:
(a) Order the offender to report directly to the [chief law enforcement] registration
official in the county or city not within a county where the adjudication was heard to register
as provided in sections 589.400 to 589.425; and
(b) Complete the initial notification of duty to register form approved by the state
judicial records committee and the Missouri state highway patrol and forward the form within
three business days to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement]
registration official in the county or city not within a county where the offender was
adjudicated.
2. If the offender resides in Missouri and refuses to complete and sign the registration
information as provided in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section, or if the offender
resides outside of Missouri and refuses to directly report to the [chief law enforcement]
registration official as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section, the
offender commits the offense of failure to register under section 589.425.
589.407. 1. Any registration pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall consist of
completion of an offender registration form developed by the Missouri state highway patrol
or other format approved by the Missouri state highway patrol. Such form shall consist of a
statement, including the signature of the offender, and shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:

HB 3049 27
(1) A statement in writing signed by the person, giving the name, address, date of
birth, Social Security number, and phone number of the person, the license plate number and
vehicle description, including the year, make, model, and color of each vehicle owned or
operated by the offender, any online identifiers[, as defined in section 43.651,] used by the
person, the place of employment of such person, enrollment within any institutions of higher
education, the crime which requires registration, whether the person was sentenced as a
persistent or predatory offender pursuant to section 566.125, the date, place, and a brief
description of such crime, the date and place of the conviction or plea regarding such crime,
the age and gender of the victim at the time of the offense and whether the person successfully
completed the Missouri sexual offender program pursuant to section 589.040, if applicable;
(2) The fingerprints and palm prints of the person;
(3) Unless the offender's appearance has not changed significantly, a photograph of
such offender as follows:
(a) Quarterly if a tier III sex offender [under section 589.414]. Such photograph shall
be taken every ninety days beginning in the month of the person's birth;
(b) Semiannually if a tier II sex offender. Such photograph shall be taken in the
month of the person's birth and six months thereafter; and
(c) Yearly if a tier I sex offender. Such photograph shall be taken in the month of the
person's birth; [and]
(4) A DNA sample from the individual, if a sample has not already been obtained;
and
(5) Information regarding any temporary residence where the offender is
staying away from his or her primary residence for seven or more days, including the
period of time the offender is staying in such place, regardless of whether the temporary
residence is in Missouri or any other place.
2. The offender shall provide positive identification and documentation to
substantiate the accuracy of the information completed on the offender registration form,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) A photocopy of a valid driver's license or nondriver's identification card;
(2) A document verifying proof of the offender's residency; and
(3) A photocopy of the vehicle registration for each of the offender's vehicles.
3. The Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain all required registration
information in digitized form.
4. [Upon receipt of any changes to an offender's registration information contained in
this section, the Missouri state highway patrol shall immediately notify all other jurisdictions
in which the offender is either registered or required to register.

HB 3049 28
5.] The offender shall be responsible for reviewing his or her existing registration
information for accuracy at every regular in-person appearance and, if any inaccuracies are
found, provide proof of the information in question.
5. (1) Regular in-person appearances to the registration official following initial
registration shall be required:
(a) Annually for tier I offenders;
(b) Every six months for tier II offenders; and
(c) Every ninety days for tier III offenders.
(2) For the purposes of establishing a schedule for registration appearances, the
registration official shall ensure that the required registration interval is followed from
the date of any initial registration until the month of an offender's birth and at the
appropriate interval beginning from the month of the offender's birth thereafter.
6. The signed offender registration form shall serve as proof that the individual
understands his or her duty to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425
and a statement to this effect shall be included on the form that the individual is required to
sign at each registration.
7. If an offender has a guardian appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction,
the guardian may sign affirming the accuracy of the offender registration form under
this section. Nothing in this subsection shall alleviate the requirements of the offender to
appear in person, nor shall this subsection be construed to affect any restrictions
applicable to an offender because of the offender's status on the sexual offender registry.
589.410. 1. All notifications of a requirement to register shall be reported to the
sex offender registry within three days, in a manner prescribed by the Missouri state
highway patrol.
2. The [chief law enforcement] registration official shall [forward] enter the
completed offender registration [form to] forms and related updates into the sex offender
registry in a manner prescribed by the Missouri state highway patrol within three days.
The Missouri state highway patrol shall [enter] ensure the information entered into the sex
offender registry is accessible through the Missouri uniform law enforcement system
(MULES) [where it is] and forwarded to the National Crime Information Center (NCIC)
in accordance with applicable law. The information shall also be available to members of
the criminal justice system, and other entities as provided by law, upon inquiry. Certain
portions of the information shall also be published on the internet in accordance with
this section.
[43.650.] 589.411. 1. The Missouri state highway patrol shall[, subject to
appropriation,] maintain a web page on the internet which shall be open to the public and
shall include a registered sexual offender search capability.

HB 3049 29
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 of this section, the registered sexual
offender search shall make it possible for any person using the internet to search for and find
the information specified in subsection 4 of this section, if known, on offenders registered in
this state pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.
3. The registered sexual offender search shall include the capability to search for
sexual offenders by name, zip code, and by typing in an address and specifying a search
within a certain number of miles radius from that address.
4. Only the information listed in this subsection shall be provided to the public in the
registered sexual offender search:
(1) The name and any known aliases of the offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias dates of birth of the offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and school addresses of the offender, including
the street address, city, county, state, and zip code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;
(6) A physical description of the offender's vehicles, including the year, make, model,
color, and license plate number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses qualifying the offender to register, including
the tier level assigned to the offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was released from the department of mental
health, prison, or jail, or placed on parole, supervised release, or probation for the offenses
qualifying the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with the provisions of section 589.400 to
589.425; and
(10) Any online identifiers[, as defined in section 43.651,] used by the person. Such
online identifiers shall not be included in the general profile of an offender on the web page
and shall only be available to a member of the public by a search using the specific online
identifier to determine if a match exists with a registered offender.
5. Juveniles required to register under subdivision [(5)] (4) of subsection 1 of section
589.400 shall be exempt from public notification on the internetto include any adjudications
from another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country or any federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction.
6. The Missouri state highway patrol shall regularly update the web page to
remove persons who have been ordered removed or exempt by a court in accordance
with section 589.401 persons who are deceased and persons who have moved out of the
state. In the case of a person who has moved out of the state, the entry shall remain until
the Missouri state highway patrol confirms the person has complied with all registration

HB 3049 30
requirements in the person's new state, territory, or country of residence, when
applicable.
7. In addition to the web page maintained by the Missouri state highway patrol,
a registration official may maintain a web page on the internet, which shall be open to
the public and shall include a registered sexual offender search capability. Except as
provided in subsections 5 and 6 of this section, the registered sexual offender search
shall make it possible for any person using the internet to search for and find the
information specified in subsection 5 of this section, if known, on offenders registered in
this state pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425. The chief law enforcement officer of
any county or city not within a county may also publish in any newspaper distributed in
the county or city not within a county the offender information provided under
subsection 3 of this section for any offender residing in the county or city not within a
county.
[43.651.] 589.412. [1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information or communication by the use of
the internet, a computer, a facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or other wireless
communication device, a video recorder, or other electronic means sent to a person identified
by a unique address or address number and received by that person;
(2) "Entity", a business or organization that provides internet service, electronic
communications service, remote computing service, online service, electronic mail service, or
electronic instant message or chat services whether the business or organization is within or
outside this state;
(3) "Instant message", a form of real-time text communication between two or more
people. The communication is conveyed via computers connected over a network such as the
internet, or between cell phone or wireless communication device users, or over a cell phone
or wireless communication device network;
(4) "Online identifier", includes all of the following: electronic mail address and
instant message screen name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless communication device
number or identifier, chat or other internet communication name, or other identity
information.
2.] Subject to appropriations, the Missouri state highway patrol shall make registry
information regarding a registered sexual offender's online identifiers available to an entity
for the purpose of allowing the entity to prescreen users or for comparison with information
held by the entity as provided by this subsection:
(1) The information obtained by an entity from the state sexual offender registry shall
not be used for any purpose other than for prescreening its users or comparing the database of
registered users of the entity against the list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual

HB 3049 31
offender registry in order to protect children from online sexual predators. The Missouri
state highway patrol shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the release and use of
online identifier information. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall be
invalid and void;
(2) Any entity desiring to prescreen its users or compare its database of registered
users to the list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender registry may apply
to the Missouri state highway patrol to access the information. An entity that complies with
the rules and regulations promulgated by the Missouri state highway patrol regarding the
release and use of the online identifier information and pays the fee established by the
Missouri state highway patrol may screen new users or compare its database of registered
users to the list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender registry as
frequently as the Missouri state highway patrol may allow for the purpose of identifying a
registered user associated with an online identifier contained in the state sexual offender
registry;
(3) Any entity complying with this subsection in good faith shall be immune from any
civil or criminal liability resulting from:
(a) The entity's refusal to provide system service to a person on the basis that the
entity believed that the person was required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(b) A person's criminal or tortious acts when the person is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425, and the person complied with the requirement to
register their online identifiers under section 589.407, and committed the criminal or tortious
acts against a minor with whom he or she had communicated on the entity's system by using
their registered online identifier; or
(c) Any activity for which the entity would be immune from liability under 47 U.S.C.
Section 230.
[43.533.] 589.413. 1. The Missouri state highway patrol shall, subject to
appropriation, operate a toll-free telephone number in order to disseminate registration
information provided by [individuals] persons who are required to register under sections
589.400 to 589.425, and receive information from persons regarding the residency of a
registered sexual offender. The information available via the telephone number shall include
only information that offenders are required to provide under section 589.407. When the

HB 3049 32
Missouri state highway patrol provides such information regarding a sexual offender, the
patrol personnel shall advise the person making the inquiry that positive identification of a
person believed to be a sexual offender cannot be established unless a fingerprint comparison
is made, and that it is illegal to use such information regarding a registered sexual offender to
facilitate the commission of a crime. The toll-free telephone number shall be published on
the Missouri state highway patrol's sexual offender registry website maintained under
section [43.650] 589.411.
2. The Missouri state highway patrol shall promulgate rules to effect the
enforcement of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be
invalid and void.
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall,
within three business days, appear in person to the [chief law enforcement officer of the
county or city not within a county] registration official if there is a change to any of the
following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within
three business days, notify the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of the county or
city not within a county] of any changes to the following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) [Temporary lodging information;
(3)] Temporary residence information;
[(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone communications; or
(5)] (3) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of electronic
communication; or
(4) Online identifiers.

HB 3049 33
3. The [chief law enforcement] registrationofficial [in the county or city not within a
county] shall immediately forward the registration changes described under subsections 1 and
2 of this section to the Missouri state highway patrol within three business days in
accordance with section 589.410.
4. (1) If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different county or city not within a county, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the [chief law enforcement] registration official with
whom the person last registered and the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the
county or city not within a county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address in
writing within three business days of such new address and phone number, if the phone
number is also changed.
(2) If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes his or
her state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction of residence, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the [chief
law enforcement] registration official with whom the person was last registered and the
[chief law enforcement] registrationofficial of the area in the new state, territory, the District
of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction
over the new residence or address within three business days of such new address.
(3) Whenever a registrant changes residence, the [chief law enforcement]
registration official of the county or city not within a county where the person was
previously registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within
three business days.
(4) When the registrant is changing the residence to a new state, territory, the District
of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the Missouri state
highway patrol shall inform the responsible official in the new state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of residence within
three business days.
5. Registrants shall appear in person before the registration official and
complete all forms required for such purposes by the United States Marshal's Service no
less than twenty-one days before travel outside of the United States. Such information
shall be forwarded to the United States Marshal's Service, and a copy shall be provided
by the registration official to the Missouri state highway patrol in a manner prescribed
by the Missouri state highway patrol.
6. Offenders shall be classified as a tier I offender, tier II offender, or tier III
offender in accordance with this section. To the extent more than one tier definition
applies to an offender, the highest tier that applies shall be the tier the offender is
classified into.

HB 3049 34
7. The initial determination as to the tier of an offender shall be made by the
registration official when an offender first appears for registration with the official.
Upon receipt of an initial offender registration from a new registration official, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall analyze the initial tier determination for accuracy.
If the Missouri state highway patrol determines the initial tier decision is inaccurate, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the registration official, and the Missouri
state highway patrol's determination shall control the tier classification. Upon receipt of
an updated tiering decision, the registration official shall notify the offender no later
than the next previously scheduled in-person check-in for the offender. Upon
notification of the offender or failure of the offender to appear at the next regularly
scheduled in-person check, reporting requirements aligning with the new tier
determination shall be in effect.
8. Tier I [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [4] 5of
this section, shall report in person [to] before the [chief law enforcement] registration
official annually in the month of their birth to verify the information contained in their
statement made pursuant to section 589.407. [Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
years of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
vulnerable person;
(h) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
eighteen years of age or older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037;
(l) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;

HB 3049 35
(n) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year; or
(o) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen years
of age;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
100 District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of an
101 offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier I sexual
102 offenses listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable
103 to those described as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
104 Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
105 6.] 9. Tier II [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [4]
106 5 of this section, shall report semiannually in person in the month of their birth and six
107 months thereafter to the [chief law enforcement] registration official to verify the
108 information contained in their statement made pursuant to section 589.407. [Tier II sexual
109 offenders include:
110 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
111 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
112 sixteen to seventeen years of age;
113 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
114 between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
115 (c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
116 seventeen years of age;
117 (d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
118 (e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
119 victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
120 (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
121 (g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025;
122 (h) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035;
123 (i) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
124 (j) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
125 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
126 (k) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
127 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
128 (l) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
129 and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year; or
130 (m) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;

HB 3049 36
131 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier I offense listed
132 in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
133 failure to register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to
134 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
135 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
136 of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
137 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses
138 listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those
139 described as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
140 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
141 7.] 10. Tier III [sexual] offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to
142 [4] 5 of this section, shall report in person [to] before the [chief law enforcement]
143 registration official every ninety days to verify the information contained in their statement
144 made under section 589.407. [Tier III sexual offenders include:
145 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual offender as defined in section
146 566.123 or a persistent sexual offender as defined in section 566.124;
147 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
148 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
149 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
150 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
151 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if the
152 offense is sexual in nature;
153 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
154 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
155 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of
156 age;
157 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
158 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
159 second or subsequent offense;
160 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
161 thirteen years of age;
162 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under
163 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
164 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
165 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
166 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater than a year;
167 (n) Incest under section 568.020;

HB 3049 37
168 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 with
169 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
170 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
171 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
172 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is under
173 thirteen years of age;
174 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim is
175 under eighteen years of age;
176 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim is
177 under eighteen years of age;
178 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim is
179 under eighteen years of age;
180 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is under
181 eighteen years of age;
182 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
183 victim is under eighteen years of age;
184 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
185 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
186 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
187 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
188 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
189 under thirteen years of age;
190 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
191 of imprisonment of more than a year;
192 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
193 offender;
194 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
195 victim is under thirteen years of age;
196 (ff) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145 if the victim is
197 under thirteen years of age;
198 (gg) Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145;
199 (hh) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
200 thirteen years of age;
201 (ii) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
202 (jj) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
203 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier I or tier II
204 offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other

HB 3049 38
205 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to
206 register as a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I
207 offenses, or combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous
208 occasion;
209 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
210 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense of
211 a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
212 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
213 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
214 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
215 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or tier
216 II offense in this section.
217 8.] 11. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to [7] 5 and 8 to 10 of this
218 section, all Missouri registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend
219 any school whether public or private, including any secondary school, trade school,
220 professional school, or institution of higher education, on a full-time or part-time basis or
221 have a temporary residence in this state shall be required to report in person [to] before the
222 [chief law enforcement officer] registration official in the area of the state where they work,
223 including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any school or training and register in that
224 state. ["Part-time" in this subsection means for more than seven days in any twelve-month
225 period.
226 9.] 12. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections
227 589.400 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier [as defined in section 43.651],
228 the person shall report such information in the same manner as a change of residence before
229 using such online identifier.
589.415. [1.] Any probation officer or parole officer assigned to a sexual offender
who is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall notify the
appropriate law enforcement officials whenever the probation officer or parole officer has
reason to believe that the offender will be changing his or her residence. Upon obtaining the
new address where the offender expects to reside, the probation officer or parole officer
shall report such address to the [chief law enforcement] registration official with whom the
offender last registered and the [chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
having jurisdiction over the new residence, if different. The probation officer or parole
officer shall also inform the offender of the offender's duty to register. However, nothing in
this section shall affect the offender's duty to register, pursuant to sections 589.400 to
589.425.

HB 3049 39
[2. As used in this section, the term "probation officer" includes any agent of a private
entity assigned to provide probation supervision services to an offender due to the offender's
status as a sexual offender who is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to
589.425.]
589.417. 1. Except for the specific information listed in subsection 2 of this section,
the complete statements, photographs and fingerprints required by sections 589.400 to
589.425 shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 610 and are not public records as
defined in section 610.010, and shall be available only to courts, prosecutors and law
enforcement agencies.
2. [Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the chief law enforcement
official of the county] (1) The following information shall be available as an open record
under chapter 610:
(a) Any information retained by the Missouri state highway patrol required to
be published on the internet at the time of the request, as provided in section 589.411;
and
(b) The name, offense requiring registration, dates of registration, and
compliance status of any offender who has been removed from the internet because
of death or a move out of the state. For offenders who have moved out of the state, the
new state of residence shall also be an open record.
(2) The registration official shall maintain, for all offenders registered in such
county, a complete list of the names, addresses and crimes for which such offenders are
registered. Any person may request such list from the [chief law enforcement] registration
official of the county.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to open any records relating to an
offender who has been removed from the sexual offender registry or found exempt
under section 589.401. Such records shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 610.
4. The metadata recorded by the sex offender registry system, website, or other
related databases utilized by the sex offender registry including activity logs, user
information, or other related information shall be a closed record, available only to
authorized users for the administration of criminal justice, as the term "administration
of criminal justice" is defined in section 43.500.
[589.402. 1. The chief law enforcement officer of the county or city
not within a county may maintain a web page on the internet, which shall be
open to the public and shall include a registered sexual offender search
capability.
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 of this section, the
registered sexual offender search shall make it possible for any person using
the internet to search for and find the information specified in subsection 3 of

HB 3049 40
this section, if known, on offenders registered in this state pursuant to sections
589.400 to 589.425.
3. Only the information listed in this subsection shall be provided to
the public in the registered sexual offender search:
(1) The name and any known aliases of the offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias dates of birth of the
offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and school addresses of the
offender, including the street address, city, county, state, and zip code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;
(6) A physical description of the offender's vehicles, including the
year, make, model, color, and license plate number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses qualifying the offender to
register, including the tier level assigned to the offender under sections
589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was released from the department
of mental health, prison, or jail, or placed on parole, supervised release, or
probation for the offenses qualifying the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with the provisions of sections
589.400 to 589.425; and
(10) Any online identifiers, as defined in section 43.651, used by the
person. Such online identifiers shall not be included in the general profile of
an offender on the web page and shall only be available to a member of the
public by a search using the specific online identifier to determine if a match
exists with a registered offender.
4. The chief law enforcement officer of any county or city not within a
county may publish in any newspaper distributed in the county or city not
within a county the sexual offender information provided under subsection 3
of this section for any offender residing in the county or city not within a
county.
5. Juveniles required to register under subdivision (6) of subsection 1
of section 589.400 shall be exempt from public notification to include any
adjudications from another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country or any federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction.]
✔